Nevada, session 83, SB473.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Educator
Effectiveness budget account for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $2,384
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $4,768
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Office of the
Superintendent budget account for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $13,180
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $13,180
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Standards and
Instructional Support budget account for the replacement of
computer hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $7,152
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $9,536
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Assessments
and Accountability budget account for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $15,135
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $2,384
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Student and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
School Support budget account for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $7,152
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $45,296
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Data Systems
Management budget account for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $11,252
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $16,075
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the District
Support Services budget account for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $21,456
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $4,768
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 9. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Safe and
Respectful Learning budget account for the replacement of
computer hardware and associated software the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $7,152
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $16,688
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 10. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $2,384 for the
Account for Alternative Schools budget account for the replacement
of computer hardware and associated software.
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $3,338 for
the Continuing Education budget account for the replacement of
computer hardware and associated software.
2. Expenditure of $6,198 not appropriated from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 by the
Department of Education for the same purpose as set forth in
subsection 1.
Sec. 12. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $2,384 for the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Parental Involvement and Family Engagement budget account for
the replacement of computer hardware and associated software.
Sec. 13. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $9,536 for
the Office of Early Learning and Development budget account for
the replacement of computer hardware and associated software.
2. Expenditure of the following sums not appropriated from the
State General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
by the Department of Education for the same purposes as set forth in
subsection 1:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $9,536
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $2,384
Sec. 14. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $4,768 for the
Literacy Programs budget account for the replacement of computer
hardware and associated software.
Sec. 15. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $4,731 for the Data
Systems Management budget account for the replacement of office
chairs.
Sec. 16. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 10 to 16, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 17. 1. This section and sections 1 to 9, inclusive, and 11
to 16, inclusive, of this act become effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Section 10 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)